Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 9
Local Pension Funds Generally

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6341, provided: “Effect of transfer on retirement system membership and health insurance plan participation.

“(a)

As used in this section, ‘retirement system’ means:

“(1)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq.;

“(2)

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-5-103;

“(3)

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-4-103;

“(4)

The State Police Retirement System, established by § 24-6-203;

“(5)

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, established by § 24-8-201 et seq.;

“(6)

An alternate retirement plan for:

“(A)

A college, university, or the Department of Higher Education provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq.; and

“(B)

A vocational-technical school or the Department of Career Education provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq.;

“(7)

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System provided for under § 24-10-101 et seq.; and

“(8)

A firemen's relief and pension fund or a policemen's pension and relief fund provided for under § 24-11-101 et seq.

“(b)

If this act results in an employee who is a current member of a retirement system prior to the effective date of this act being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different retirement system than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act by written election and notice to the new employer and affected retirement system, make a one-time choice to:

“(1)

Remain in his or her same retirement system prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Become a member of the retirement system of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions for a reciprocal member to be transferred as an active member to a reciprocal system as currently provided by law under the system to which the reciprocal member is transferred.

“(c)

If this act results in an employee being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different health insurance plan than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act, make a one-time choice between:

“(1)

Continuing to participate in his or her health insurance plan prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Participating in the health insurance plan of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law.

“(d)(1)(A)

A retirement system may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (b) of this section.

“(B)

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (c) of this section.

“(2)

A policy under subdivision (d)(1) of this section is not a rule under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.”

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

[Reserved]

Subchapter 2
— Investment of Pension and Trust Funds

Cross References.

Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, investments, § 24-10-402.

Public employee retirement plans generally, investments, § 24-2-201 et seq.

24-9-201. Legislative intent.

Authorized investments of moneys by the governing bodies of the various trust funds within this state are now provided by law. It is not the intent of this subchapter to change or prescribe the allowable investments in certificates of deposit, registered securities, or negotiable securities.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 282, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2103.

24-9-202. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “trust funds” means all assets and holdings of the various firemen's and policemen's pension funds of this state. In addition, other assets and holdings which are of a trust nature and are under the administration of political subdivisions of this state are, for purposes of this subchapter, to be considered trust funds. However, trust funds shall not include funds required to be maintained by ordinances, resolutions, or indentures securing bond issues of political subdivisions.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 282, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2101.

24-9-203. Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply to all funds as defined in § 24-9-202 and administered by any political subdivision of this state.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 282, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2102.

24-9-204. Employment of trust administrators.

By board action, the board of trustees may employ a commercial firm normally engaged in providing trust services, if each employee of the trust department who handles the trust funds is covered by a good and sufficient fidelity bond, to act as the agent for the board of the trust for the purpose of maintaining and administering the fund and to provide such assistance or services as the board of the trust may reasonably require in the performance of its duties.

The bank or firm so employed shall not have the authority to make any investment decision or any determination as to the eligibility of any person entitled to receive a pension or any other benefit from the fund, nor to make any determination as to the amount of any pension or benefit which any person may be entitled to receive from the fund.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 282, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2108.

24-9-205. Bank accounts.

When the governing body of a trust deposits money of that trust in a commercial bank account or in a trust account of a trust department of a bank or other firm normally engaged in providing trust services, the following minimum requirements must be met:

Funds must be deposited into the account in the name of the trust;

Withdrawals from the account, whether by check or warrant, shall require the signatures of the chair and the treasurer of the board of the trust; and

The treasurer shall execute a bond to the board of trustees with good and sufficient sureties in such penal sum as the board shall direct, conditioned on the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office.

The bond shall be filed in the office of the board of trustees.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 282, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2104.

24-9-206. Certificates of deposit.

When a governing body of a trust shall decide to invest moneys belonging to the trust in certificates of deposit, the following conditions must be met:

The certificate of deposit must be issued in the name of the trust;

The certificate, when received, must be maintained at the office of the board of trustees or in the trust department of a firm normally engaged in providing trust services; and

Subsequent to the purchasing of a certificate of deposit, the board of trustees shall be required to request confirmation of the validity of the certificate directly from the issuing bank.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 282, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2105.

24-9-207. Registered securities.

When the governing body of a trust decides to invest trust moneys in registered securities, all the securities purchased shall be issued in the name of the trust with at least the signatures of two (2) members of the board required for renegotiation of the securities.

One (1) signature shall be that of the board treasurer and the other that of the chair of the board.

The securities are to be maintained in the office of the board of trustees or the trust department of a commercial firm normally engaged in providing trust services.

Subsequent to the purchase of the securities, the board of trustees shall request confirmation directly from the issuing company of the registration of the securities. The confirmation shall be made by the board independently of the agent through whom the securities were purchased.

The board of trustees shall maintain copies of the confirmation letters as a part of its records.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 282, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2106.

24-9-208. Negotiable securities.

When the board of trustees of a trust decides to invest trust moneys in negotiable securities, the board shall purchase the securities from reputable bonded dealers in those securities.

The board shall require the dealers to certify to the authenticity of the securities.

The securities shall be held in the office of the board of trustees or by the trust department of a commercial firm normally engaged in providing trust services.

The sale of negotiable securities shall require written authorization from at least two (2) board members, one being the board treasurer and the other the chair of the board.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 282, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2107.

24-9-209. Listing of securities.

The board shall maintain a detailed listing of all securities owned by the trust.

Purchases and sales of securities shall be by official board action documented in the board minutes.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 282, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2109.